Massachusetts, session 194th, S288.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Massachusetts General Laws Section 129D of Chapter 140 as amended by Section 46(d)
of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking the following:-- "pursuant to
subsection (c)".
of 1